tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları: Kumlama Aksesuarları; Balta Aksesuarları; Kesici Aksesuarları; Matkap ve Tornavide Aksesuarları; Sökme Takma Aleti Aksesuarları; El Feneri Aksesuarları; Taşlama Makinesi Aksesuarları; Çekiç Aksesuarları; Endüstriyel Zımba Makineleri; Sabitleyiciler; Magnetizörler ve Demagnetizörler; Çapa ve Kazma Aksesuarları; Ölçüm Aleti ve Sensör Aksesuarları; Karıştırıcı Uçlar; Boya Aleti Aksesuarları; Elektrikli Alet Bataryaları; Elektrikli Alet Şarj Cihazları; Freze Aksesuarları; Zımparalama Aksesuarları; Testere Aksesuarları; Planya Tezgahı Aksesuarları; Havya Aksesuarları; Alet Bıçak Ağızları; Alet Sapı Kamaları; Alet Güvenlik Bağları; Alet Yuvaları; Alet Stantları; Kamalama Araçları; Kaynak Makinesi Aksesuarları
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件: 喷砂机配件; 斧子配件; 切割机配件; 钻孔机/螺丝刀配件; 起子配件; 手电筒配件; 研磨机配件; 锤子配件; 排钉; 夹具; 加磁器/消磁器; 鹤嘴锄/镐配件; 测量工具与传感器配件; 搅拌工具桨叶; 油漆工具配件; 电动工具电池; 电动工具充电器; 镂铣机配件; 砂磨配件; 锯配件; 刨床配件; 烙铁配件; 工具刀片; 工具堵漏楔; 工具安全绳; 工具套筒; 工具台; 楔形工具; 焊接配件
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas: Acessórios de jateadores abrasivos; Acessórios de machado; Acessórios de cortador; Acessórios de berbequim e chave de fendas; Acessórios de acionador; Acessórios de lanterna; Acessórios de lixadora/esmeril; Acessórios de martelo; Grampos industriais; Gabaritos; Magnetizadores e desmagnetizadores; Acessórios de alvião e picareta; Ferramentas de medição e acessórios de sensores; Pás de mistura; Acessórios de pás de mistura; Baterias de ferramenta elétrica; Carregadores de ferramenta elétrica; Acessórios de tupia; Acessórios de lixagem; Acessórios de serras; Acessórios de moldador; Acessórios de ferro de soldar; Lâminas para ferramentas; Cunhas de ferramentas manuais; Correias de segurança de ferramentas; Chaves de caixa de ferramentas; Apoios de ferramentas; Ferramentas de cunhas; Acessórios de solda
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai: Abrazyvinių pūstuvų priedai; Kirvių priedai; Pjoviklių priedai; Gręžtuvų ir atsuktuvų priedai; Suktuvų priedai; Žibintuvėlių priedai; Šlifuoklių priedai; Plaktukų priedai; Pramoninės kabės; Įtvarai; Magnetizatoriai ir demagnetizatoriai; Kauptukų ir kirtiklių priedai; Matavimo įrankių ir jutiklių priedai; Maišymo įrankių mentelės; Dažymo įrankių priedai; Elektrinių įrankių akumuliatoriai; Elektrinių įrankių įkrovikliai; Frezų priedai; Šlifavimo priedai; Pjūklų priedai; Formavimo priedai; Lituoklių priedai; Įrankių peiliai; Įrankių rankenų pleištai; Įrankių saugos dirželiai; Įrankių lizdai; Įrankių stovai; Pleištai; Suvirinimo priedai
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas: Accesorios para granallado; Accesorios para hachas; Accesorios para cúteres; Accesorios para taladros y destornilladores; Accesorios para destornilladores eléctricos; Accesorios para linterna; Accesorios para rectificadoras; Accesorios para martillos; Grapas industriales; Plantillas posicionadoras; Magnetizadores y desmagnetizadores; Accesorios para azadón y pico; Accesorios para sensores y herramientas de medición; Palas para mezcladoras; Accesorios para herramientas de pintura; Baterías para herramientas eléctricas; Cargadores para herramientas eléctricas; Accesorios para fresadora; Accesorios de lijar; Accesorios para sierras; Accesorios para limadora; Accesorios para soldador; Hojas o cuchillas; Chavetas para herramientas; Anclajes de seguridad para herramientas; Casquillos para herramientas; Bases para herramientas; Herramientas de cuña; Accesorios para soldaduras
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo: Príslušenstvo pre pieskovačky; Príslušenstvo pre sekery; Príslušenstvo pre rezačky; Príslušenstvo k vŕtačkám a skrutkovačom; Príslušenstvo pre jednotku pohonu; Príslušenstvo pre baterky; Brúsne príslušenstvo; Príslušenstvo pre kladivá; Priemyselné svorky; Dierovačky; Magnetizéry a demagnetizéry; Príslušenstvo ku krompáčom a motykám; Príslušenstvo pre meracie prístroje a snímače; Miešacie hlavy; Príslušenstvo pre lakovacie nástroje; Batérie do elektrického náradia; Nabíjačky elektrického náradia; Príslušenstvo pre frézky; Príslušenstvo na brúsenie; Príslušenstvo pre píly; Tvarovacie príslušenstvo; Príslušenstvo pre spájkovačky; Čepele náradia; Kliny na rukoväti náradia; Bezpečnostné popruhy na náradie; Zásuvky na náradie; Stojany na náradie; Klinové nástroje; Zváračské príslušenstvo
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör: Sandblästertillbehör; Yxtillbehör; Tillbehör till skärare; Tillbehör till borrmaskiner och skruvdragare; Mejseltillbehör; Tillbehör till ficklampor; Tillbehör till slipmaskin; Tillbehör till hammare; Häftklamrar för industribruk; Jiggar; Magnetiserare och avmagnetiserare; Tillbehör till hackor och spetshackor; Tillbehör till mätverktyg och sensorer; Degknådare för matberedare; Tillbehör till målarverktyg; Batterier till eldrivna verktyg; Laddare till eldrivna verktyg; Tillbehör till handöverfräsar; Tillbehör till slippapper; Sågtillbehör; Tillbehör till kipphyvlar; Tillbehör till lödkolvar; Verktygsblad; Kilar till verktygshandtag; Bälteshakar för verktyg; Verktygshylsor; Verktygsställ; Kilverktyg; Tillbehör för svetsning
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ: Phụ kiện máy phun hạt mài; Phụ kiện rìu; Phụ kiện máy cắt; Phụ kiện máy khoan và tua vít; Phụ kiện lái xe; Phụ kiện đèn nháy; Phụ kiện máy mài; Phụ kiện cho búa; Máy dập ghim công nghiệp; Đồ gá lắp; Nam châm tĩnh điện và khử tĩnh điện; Phụ kiện cuốc chim; Phụ kiện bộ cảm biến và dụng cụ đo; Cánh trộn; Phụ kiện dụng cụ sơn; Pin cho dụng cụ điện; Bộ sạc cho dụng cụ điện; Phụ kiện máy xoi; Phụ kiện chà nhám; Phụ kiện cưa; Phụ kiện máy tiện, bào; Phụ kiện mỏ hàn; Lưỡi cưa/cắt; Nêm tay cầm dụng cụ; Dây buộc an toàn công cụ; Bộ đầu tuýp; Giá để dụng cụ; Dụng cụ nêm; Phụ kiện hàn xì
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов: Аксессуары для абразивоструйных аппаратов; Аксессуары для топоров; Аксессуары для режущих инструментов; Аксессуары для дрелей и шуруповертов; Аксессуары для гайковертов; Аксессуары для фонарей; Аксессуары для шлифовальных машин; Аксессуары для молотков; Строительные скобы; Направляющие и кондукторы; Намагничиватели и размагничиватели; Аксессуары для мотыг и кирок; Аксессуары для измерительных инструментов и датчиков; Насадки для инструментов для смешивания; Аксессуары для малярных инструментов; Аккумуляторы для электроинструментов; Зарядные устройства для электроинструментов; Аксессуары для фрезерования; Аксессуары для шлифования; Аксессуары для пил; Аксессуары для фрезерных станков по дереву; Аксессуары для паяльников; Лезвия и полотна для инструментов; Клинья для инструментов; Страховочные тросы для инструментов; Торцевые головки для инструментов; Подставки и столы для инструментов; Клинья; Аксессуары для сварочных работ
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør: Tilbehør for sandblåsere; Tilbehør for økser; Skjæretilbehør; Tilbehør for driller og skrutrekkere; Drivertilbehør; Tilbehør til lommelykter; Tilbehør til slipemaskiner; Tilbehør til hammere; Industrielle stifter; Jigger; Magnetiserere og avmagnetiserere; Tilbehør til hakker; Tilbehør til måleverktøyer og sensorer; Visper til blandeverktøy; Tilbehør til malingsverktøy; Batterier til strømdrevet verktøy; Ladere til strømdrevet verktøy; Rutertilbehør; Pussetilbehør; Tilbehør til sager; Høveltilbehør; Tilbehør for loddebolter; Verktøyblader; Kiler for verktøyhåndtak; Sikkerhetsfester for verktøy; Verktøypiper; Verktøystativer; Kileverktøy; Sveisetilbehør
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires: Accessoires voor zandstralers; Bijlaccessoires; Accessoires voor snijmachines; Booraccessoires; Accessoires voor aandrijvingen; Zaklampaccessoires; Accessoires voor slijpmachines; Hameraccessoires; Industriële nietjes; Boormallen; Magnetiseerders en demagnetiseerders; Accessoires voor pikhouwelen; Accessoires voor meethulpmiddelen en sensoren; Mengstaven; Accessoires voor verfgereedschappen; Gereedschapsaccu's; Opladers; Kantenfreesaccessoires; Schuuraccessoires; Accessoires voor zagen; Bovenfreesaccessoires; Soldeerboutaccessoires; Gereedschapbladen; Wiggen voor gereedschapsstelen; Gereedschapskoorden; Dopsleutels; Gereedschapstandaarden; Wiggen; Lasaccessoires
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi: Accessori per sabbiatura; Accessori per asce; Accessori per taglierine; Accessori per trapani e cacciavite; Accessori per conducenti; Accessori torce elettriche; Accessori per smerigliatrici; Accessori per martelli; Graffette industriali; Maschere di foratura; Magnetizzatori e demagnetizzatori; Accessori per zappascuri e picconi; Accessori strumenti/sensori misurazione; Pale per miscelatori; Accessori per verniciatura; Batterie per utensili elettrici; Caricabatterie per utensili elettrici; Accessori fresatrici verticali; Accessori per carteggio; Accessori per seghe; Accessori per limatrici; Accessori saldatori a stilo; Lame per attrezzi; Cunei per manici di utensili; Cordini di sicurezza per attrezzi; Prese per strumenti; Supporti per attrezzi; Cunei; Accessori per saldatura
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件: 噴砂機配件; 斧用配件; 切割用具配件; 電鑽/電動起子配件; 駕駛配件; 手電筒配件; 研磨機配件; 錘配件; 工業用訂書針; 夾具; 磁化器和消磁器; 十字鎬/鍬配件; 測量工具和感測器配件; 攪拌工具輪葉; 油漆工具配件; 動力工具電池; 強力工具充電器; 修邊機配件; 磨砂配件; 鋸刀配件; 鉋床配件; 烙鐵配件; 工具刀片; 工具把手楔子; 工具掛繩; 內孔軸承工具; 工具腳架; 楔型工具; 焊接配件
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων: Αξεσουάρ για φυσητήρα λειαντικού μέσου; Αξεσουάρ τσεκουριών; Αξεσουάρ κοπτικών ειδών; Αξεσουάρ τρυπανιών & κατσαβιδιών; Αξεσουάρ οδηγών; Αξεσουάρ φακών; Αξεσουάρ τροχών; Αξεσουάρ σφυριού; Βιομηχανικοί συνδετήρες; Οδηγοί εργαλείων; Μαγνητιστές & απομαγνητιστές; Αξεσουάρ για αξίνες & σκαπάνες; Αξεσουάρ για εργαλεία μέτρησης & αισθητήρες; Σπάτουλες εργαλείων για μίξη υλικών; Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων βαφής; Μπαταρίες ηλεκτρικών εργαλείων; Φορτιστές ηλεκτρικών εργαλείων; Αξεσουάρ φρέζας; Αξεσουάρ λείανσης; Αξεσουάρ πριονιών; Αξεσουάρ διαμορφωτών; Αξεσουάρ για συσκευές συγκόλλησης (κολλητήρια); Λεπίδες εργαλείων; Σφήνες λαβής εργαλείου; Ιμάντες ασφαλείας εργαλείων; Υποδοχές εργαλείων; Βάσεις εργαλείων; Εργαλεία σφηνών; Αξεσουάρ συγκόλλησης
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør: Sandblæser – tilbehør; Tilbehør til økser; Fræsertilbehør; Bor – tilbehør; Drivhjul – tilbehør; Lygte – tilbehør; Tilbehør til slibemaskine; Hammer – tilbehør; Hæfteklammer til industribrug; Bore- og skærelære; Magnetisering og afmagnetisering; Tilbehør til hakker og spidshakker; Måleværktøj og -sensor – tilbehør; Mixerjern; Maleværktøj – tilbehør; Elektrisk værktøj – batterier; Elektrisk værktøj – opladere; Fræser tilbehør; Slibning med sandpapir – tilbehør; Sav – tilbehør; Profilfræser – tilbehør; Loddekolbe – tilbehør; Værktøjsklinger; Kiler til værktøjsskafter; Stropper til værktøjssikring; Værktøjsmuffer; Værktøjsholdere; Kiler; Svejsetilbehør
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories: Abrasive Blaster Accessories; Axe Accessories; Cutter Accessories; Drill & Screwdriver Accessories; Driver Accessories; Flashlight Accessories; Grinder Accessories; Hammer Accessories; Industrial Staples; Jigs; Magnetizers & Demagnetizers; Mattock & Pickaxe Accessories; Measuring Tool & Sensor Accessories; Mixing Tool Paddles; Paint Tool Accessories; Power Tool Batteries; Power Tool Chargers; Router Accessories; Sanding Accessories; Saw Accessories; Shaper Accessories; Soldering Iron Accessories; Tool Blades; Tool Handle Wedges; Tool Safety Tethers; Tool Sockets; Tool Stands; Wedge Tools; Welding Accessories
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství: Příslušenství k pískovačkám; Příslušenství k sekerám; Střihací a řezací nástroje – příslušenství; Příslušenství k vrtačkám; Příslušenství k utahovákům; Svítilny – příslušenství; Příslušenství k bruskám; Příslušenství ke kladivům; Průmyslové sponky; Upínáky; Magnetizační a demagnetizační přístroje; Příslušenství ke krumpáčům a motykám; Příslušenství pro měřicí nástroje a přístroje; Míchací metly; Příslušenství k malířskému náčiní; Baterie k elektrickému nářadí; Nabíječky elektrického nářadí; Příslušenství k frézkám; Příslušenství pro ruční broušení; Příslušenství k pilám; Příslušenství k obrážečkám; Příslušenství k pájkám; Čepele a kotouče; Klíny do násad nástrojů; Bezpečnostní lanka na nástroje; Gola sady; Pracovní stojany; Klínové nástroje; Příslušenství pro svařování
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품: 연마제 분사기 부대용품; 도끼 부대용품; 절단기 부대용품; 드릴/스크루드라이버 부대용품; 드라이버 부대용품; 손전등 부대용품; 연삭기 부대용품; 망치 부대용품; 공업용 스테이플러; 지그; 자화기/탈자기; 넓은날 곡괭이/곡괭이 부대용품; 측정 도구/센서 부대용품; 혼합기 패들; 페인트 도구 부대용품; 전동 공구 배터리; 전동 공구 충전기; 라우터 부대용품; 샌딩 부대용품; 톱 부대용품; 셰이퍼 부대용품; 납땜 인두 부대용품; 공구 날; 공구 손잡이 쐐기; 공구 안전 테더; 공구 소켓; 공구 스탠드; 웨지 도구; 용접 부대용품
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör: Sandstrahler-Zubehör; Axtzubehör; Schneidwerkzeug-Zubehör; Bohrzubehör; Drehmaschinenzubehör; Zubehör für Taschenlampen; Schleifmaschinenzubehör; Hammerzubehör; Klammern; Spannvorrichtungen; Magnetisierer & Entmagnetisierer; Zubehör für Hacken & Pickel; Zubehör für Messwerkzeuge & Messwertgeber; Mischwerkzeuge; Anstreichzubehör; Elektrowerkzeug-Akkus; Ladegeräte für Elektrowerkzeuge; Zubehör für Oberfräsen; Schleifzubehör; Sägenzubehör; Zubehör für Stoßmaschinen; Zubehör für Lötkolben; Werkzeugklingen & -blätter; Keile für Werkzeuggriffe; Werkzeugsicherungen; Steckschlüsseleinsätze; Werkzeugständer; Keilwerkzeuge; Schweißzubehör
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas: Acessórios para jateadores de areia; Acessórios para machado; Acessórios de corte; Acessórios para furadeiras; Acessórios para propulsores; Acessórios para lanternas; Acessórios para rebarbadoras; Acessórios para martelos; Grampo industrial; Gabaritos; Magnetizadores e desmagnetizadores; Acessórios para enxadas e picaretas; Acessórios para ferramentas de medida e sensores; Misturadores; Acessórios para ferramentas de pintura; Baterias para ferramentas elétricas; Carregadores de ferramentas elétricas; Acessórios para tupias; Acessórios para lixamento; Acessórios para serras; Acessórios para limadoras; Acessórios para ferros de solda; Lâminas para ferramentas; Cunhas para cabos de ferramentas; Correias de segurança para ferramentas; Soquetes para ferramentas; Suportes para ferramentas; Ferramentas de cunha; Acessórios de soldagem
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte: Accesorii pentru dispozitiv de sablare abraziv; Accesorii pentru topoare; Accesorii cutter; Accesorii pentru burghie și șurubelnițe; Accesorii element de acționare; Accesorii pentru lanternă; Accesorii pentru mașina de rectificat; Accesorii ciocan; Capse de uz industrial; Elemente de fixare; Magnetizatoare și demagnetizatoare; Accesorii pentru sape late și târnăcoape; Accesorii pentru instrumente de măsură și senzori; Palete pentru instrumente de amestecare; Accesorii pentru unelte pentru zugrăvit; Baterii pentru scule electrice; Încărcătoare pentru scule electrice; Accesorii rindea; Accesorii pentru șlefuire; Accesorii pentru ferăstraie; Accesorii mașină de rabotat; Accesorii ciocan de lipit; Lame de scule; Pene pentru mânere pentru scule; Coarde de siguranță pentru scule; Prize pentru scule; Suporturi pentru scule; Scule tip pană; Accesorii pentru sudură
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi: Akcesoria do piaskowania; Akcesoria do siekier; Akcesoria do nożyc; Akcesoria do wiercenia; Akcesoria do wkrętarek; Akcesoria do latarek; Akcesoria do szlifierek; Akcesoria do młotków; Zszywki przemysłowe; Osadzarki; Magnetyzery i demagnetyzery; Akcesoria do oskardów i kilofów; Akcesoria do narzędzi pomiarowych i czujników; Mieszadła; Akcesoria do narzędzi malarskich; Baterie do elektronarzędzi; Ładowarki do elektronarzędzi; Akcesoria do frezarek pionowych; Akcesoria do szlifowania; Akcesoria do pił; Akcesoria do strugarek poprzecznych; Akcesoria do lutownic; Ostrza do narzędzi; Kliny do stylisk; Smycze na narzędzia; Gniazda narzędziowe; Stojaki na narzędzia; Kliny; Akcesoria spawalnicze
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品: サンドブラスター関連用品; 斧関連用品; カッター関連用品; ドリル関連用品; ドライバー関連用品; 懐中電灯関連用品; グラインダー関連用品; ハンマー関連用品; 業務用ステープラー; ジグ; 磁化器・消磁器; マトック・つるはし関連用品; 測定機器・センサー関連用品; ミキサー用パドル; 塗装工具関連用品; 電動工具用バッテリー; 電動工具用充電器; ルーター関連用品; ヤスリ関連用品; のこぎり関連用品; シェーパー関連用品; ハンダゴテ関連用品; 工具替刃; 工具ハンドル用ウェッジ; 工具落下防止コード; ソケット; 工具スタンド; くさび工具; 溶接工具
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet: Raepuhalluskoneen lisätarvikkeet; Kirvestarvikkeet; Poikien asusteet; Poran ja ruuvinvääntimen lisätarvikkeet; Vääntimien lisätarvikkeet; Taskulampun lisätarvikkeet; Hiomakoneen lisätarvikkeet; Vasaratarvikkeet; Rakennusniitit; Työkappaleen kiinnittimet; Magnetisoijat ja demagnetisoijat; Kuokka- ja hakkutarvikkeet; Mittatyökalujen ja antureiden lisätarvikkeet; Sekoittimien lavat; Maalipensselin lisätarvikkeet; Akkutyökalujen akut; Akkutyökalujen laturit; Yläjyrsimen lisätarvikkeet; Hiontatarvikkeet; Sahatarvikkeet; Pistohöylän lisätarvikkeet; Juotoskolvin lisätarvikkeet; Työkalujen terät; Työkaluvarsien kiilat; Työkalujen putoamissuojaremmit; Holkit; Työkalutelineet; Kiilat; Hitsaustarvikkeet
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils: Accessoires de sablage; Accessoires pour haches; Accessoires pour outils de coupe; Accessoires pour perceuses et visseuses; Accessoires pour perceuses; Accessoires de lampe de poche; Accessoires pour meuleuses; Accessoires pour marteaux; Agrafes industrielles; Gabarits; Magnétiseurs et démagnétiseurs; Accessoires pour haches et pioches; Accessoires pour outils de mesure et détecteurs; Pales de malaxeur; Accessoires pour outils de peinture; Batteries d’outils électriques; Chargeurs de batteries; Accessoires pour défonceuses; Accessoires de ponçage; Accessoires pour scies; Accessoires pour toupies; Accessoires pour fers à souder; Lames d’outils; Renforts pour manches d’outils; Longes de sécurité pour outils; Douilles; Supports pour outils; Coins; Accessoires de soudage
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje: Dodatki za peskalnike; Dodatki za sekire; Dodatki za rezalnike; Dodatki za vrtalnike in vijačnike; Dodatki za gonilnike; Dodatki za svetilke; Dodatki za brusilnike; Dodatki za kladiva; Industrijske sponke; Vpenjalne priprave; Magnetizatorji in razmagnetizatorji; Dodatki za motike in krampe; Dodatki za merilna orodja in senzorje; Lopatice za mešalno orodje; Dodatki za orodje za barvanje; Baterije za električna orodja; Polnilniki za električna orodja; Dodatki za rezkarje; Dodatki za brušenje; Dodatki za žage; Dodatki za pehalne stroje; Dodatki za spajkalnike; Rezila za orodje; Klini za ročaje orodij; Varnostne zanke za orodje; Priključki za orodje; Stojala za orodje; Zagozde; Dodatki za varjenje
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat: Pribor za abrazivne strojeve za pjeskarenje; Dodaci za sjekire; Pribor za rezače; Pribor za bušilice i odvijače; Pribor za odvijače; Pribor za baterijske svjetiljke; Pribor za brusilice; Pribor za čekiće; Industrijske klamerice; Šablone; Magnetizatori i demagnetizatori; Pribor za motike i pijuke; Pribor za mjerni alat i senzore; Lopatice za alat za miješanje; Pribor za alat za bojanje; Baterije za električne alate; Punjači za električne alate; Pribor za utorne glodalice; Pribor za pjeskarenje; Pribor za pile; Pribor za oblikovanje; Pribor za lemilice; Oštrice za alat; Klinovi za drške alata; Sigurnosne trake za alat; Utični alati; Stalci za alat; Alati s klinom; Pribor za zavarivanje
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők: Csiszolószóró kiegészítők; Fejszekiegészítők; Vágókiegészítők; Fúró és csavarhúzó kiegészítők; Meghajtókiegészítők; Zseblámpakiegészítők; Köszörűkiegészítők; Kalapácskiegészítők; Ipari kapcsok; Vezetők; Mágnesezők és lemágnesezők; Csákánykiegészítők; Mérőeszköz- és érzékelőkiegészítők; Keverőszerszám-lapátok; Festőszerszám-kiegészítők; Erőszerszám-akkumulátorok; Erőszerszám-töltők; Útválasztó-kiegészítők; Csiszoláskiegészítők; Fűrészkiegészítők; Formálókiegészítők; Forrasztópáka-kiegészítők; Szerszámpengék; Szerszámfogantyú-ékek; Szerszámbiztonsági hevederek; Szerszámfoglalatok; Szerszámállványok; Ékszerszámok; Hegesztéskiegészítők
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти: Аксесоари за пясъкоструйка; Аксесоари за брадва; Аксесоари за щанцова ножица; Аксесоари за бормашини и винтоверти; Накрайници и битове; Аксесоари за фенерчета; Аксесоари за шлайф машина; Аксесоари за чук; Скоби за такер; Шаблони и водачи; Магнетизатори и демагнетизатори; Аксесоари за мотики и кирки; Измервателни инструменти и аксесоари за сензори; Бъркалки за миксер; Аксесоари за инструменти за боядисване; Батерии за електрически инструменти; Зарядни устройства за електрически инструменти; Аксесоари за оберфреза; Аксесоари за шлайфане; Аксесоари за триони; Аксесоари за формовъчни машини; Аксесоари за поялник; Остриета за инструменти; Клинове за дръжка на инструменти; Предпазни връзки за инструменти; Вложки за тресчотки; Стойки за инструменти; Клинове; Аксесоари за заваряване
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ: อุปกรณ์สำหรับเครื่องพ่นทราย; อุปกรณ์ขวาน; อุปกรณ์ครื่องตัด; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับสว่านและไขควง; อุปกรณ์ไดรเวอร์; อุปกรณ์ไฟฉาย; อุปกรณ์เครื่องบด; อุปกรณ์ค้อน; ลวดเย็บอุตสาหกรรม; อุปกรณ์จับยึด; ตัวอัดและถอนแม่เหล็ก; อุปกรณ์พลั่ว; เครื่องมือวัดและอุปกรณ์เซ็นเซอร์; ก้านเครื่องมือผสม; อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือสำหรับสี; แบตเตอรี่สำหรับเครื่องมือไฟฟ้า; ที่ชาร์จสำหรับเครื่องมือไฟฟ้า; อุปกรณ์เราเตอร์; อุปกรณ์สำหรับขัดกระดาษทราย; อุปกรณ์เลื่อย; อุปกรณ์เครื่องไส; อุปกรณ์หัวแร้ง; ใบมีดเครื่องมือ; ลิ่มสำหรับด้ามจับเครื่องมือ; สายคล้องเครื่องมือเพื่อความปลอดภัย; ซ็อกเก็ตเครื่องมือ; ที่ตั้งเครื่องมือ; เครื่องมือลิ่ม; อุปกรณ์เชื่อม